Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.872

[Art. 143] Immunity for action of military courts.

No accused may bring an action or proceeding against the convening authority or a member of a military court or officer or person acting under its authority or reviewing its proceedings because of the approval, imposition, or execution of any sentence or the imposition or collection of a fine or penalty, or the execution of any process or mandate of a military court.

[ 1963 c 220 s 128.]